Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for a six-year period beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits  for pay-
ment of expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the state agencies listed,
for the acquisition of land and the acquisition, planning, constructing, altering, repairing,
furnishing and equipping of buildings and facilities:
(1) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
(a) Labor and Industries
Building Renovation
and Seismic Upgrade................. $150,000,000
(b) Deferred Maintenance
Projects..................................... $ 15,500,000
(c) Building Automation System .... $ 5,000,000
(2) Housing and Community
Services Department:
(a) Local Innovation and
Fast Track (LIFT) Affordable
Rental Housing Program .......... $465,000,000
(b) Local Innovation and
Fast Track (LIFT)
Homeownership Program.......... $100,000,000
(c) Permanent Supportive
Housing Program ...................... $ 80,000,000
(3) Oregon Military Department:
(a) Medford Field Maintenance
Shop.......................................... $ 6,600,000
(b) Klamath Falls Readiness
Center ....................................... $ 2,000,000
(c) Linn County Readiness
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 1
Center ....................................... $ 7,000,000
(4) Department of State Police,
Area Command Center Property
Acquisition................................ $ 3,500,000
(5) Department of Corrections:
(a) Capital Improvement and
Renewal..................................... $ 50,000,000
(b) Wireless Communication
System ...................................... $ 12,900,000
(6) Oregon Youth Authority:
(a) Capital Improvements
- All Facilities ........................... $ 5,000,000
(b) CCTV and Access Control
Improvement, Phase IV ............ $ 5,551,193
(c) MacLaren Infirmary and
Pharmacy Renovation
and Expansion........................... $ 2,700,000
(7) State Forestry Department:
(a) Klamath Fire Cache Warehouse
Replacement.............................. $ 5,000,000
(b) Santiam Facility
Replacement, Phase I ............... $ 5,000,000
(c) State Forester Office
Building Restoration ................. $ 1,500,000
(d) Toledo Facility
Replacement, Phase III ............. $ 6,000,000
(e) Veneta Campus Remodel .......... $ 10,705,053
(8) State Department of
Fish and Wildlife:
(a) Capital Improvements,
Hatchery Facilities.................... $ 20,000,000
(b) North Willamette Watershed
District Office ........................... $ 5,250,000
(9) Oregon Health Authority,
Oregon State Hospital Capital
Improvements and Equipment .. $ 2,675,000
(10) Department of Veterans’
Affairs:
(a) Department of Veterans’
Affairs Salem HVAC Controls
Replacement, Phase II .............. $ 1,554,000
(b) Department of Veterans’
Affairs Salem Roof
Replacement.............................. $ 1,200,000
(11) Oregon Department of Aviation,
Oakridge Airport Runway ......... $ 2,630,000
(12) Department of Public Safety
Standards and Training,
Deferred Maintenance............... $ 3,241,060
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for a six-year period beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits  for pay-
ment of expenses from federal funds collected or  received by the state agencies listed, for
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 2
the acquisition of land and the acquisition, planning, constructing,  altering, repairing, fur-
nishing and equipping of buildings and facilities:
(1) Oregon Department of Aviation:
(a) Mulino State Airport Runway ... $ 2,974,132
(b) Aurora Airport Runway
17-354 Rehab.............................. $ 1,287,000
(2) Oregon Military Department:
(a) Boardman Multipurpose
Machine Gun Range .................. $ 13,000,000
(b) Klamath Falls Readiness
Center ....................................... $ 3,750,000
(c) Linn County Readiness
Center ....................................... $ 28,000,000
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$449,447,853 is established for a six-year period beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum  limit
for payment of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Re-
ceipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Higher
Education Coordinating Commission, for expenditures of proceeds from state  bonds issued
for the benefit of a public  university, pursuant to agreements between the commission and
a public university.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$20,000,000 is  established for a six-year period beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit
for payment of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Re-
ceipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Higher
Education Coordinating Commission, for expenditures of proceeds from state  bonds issued
for the benefit of a community college, pursuant to agreements between the commission  and
a community college.
SECTION 5. The project  approvals and expenditure limitations in sections 1, 2, 3 and 4
of this 2025 Act and the expenditure limitations established by  the Emergency Board during
the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for capital construction or acquisition  projects, expire
on June 30, 2031, unless otherwise noted.
SECTION 6. The expiration dates of the project approvals and expenditure  limitations
authorized by the Legislative Assembly for the following projects  are extended to the fol-
lowing dates:
(1) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
(a) Justice Building Exterior
Updates (Other Funds)
(section 1 (1)(b), chapter
662, Oregon Laws 2019) ............ June 30, 2027
(b) Oregon State Fair Facilities
Capital Improvements (Other
Funds) (section 1, chapter
662, Oregon Laws 2019, as
amended by section 1 (1)(k),
chapter 6, Oregon Laws 2020
(second special session)) .......... June 30, 2027
(c) Oregon State Fair Horse Barn
(Other Funds) (section 1
chapter 662, Oregon Laws 2019,
as amended by section 1 (1)(i),
chapter 6, Oregon Laws 2020
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 3
(second special session)) .......... June 30, 2027
(d) Oregon State Fair Poultry Barn
(Other Funds) (section 1,
chapter 662, Oregon Laws 2019,
as amended by section 1 (1)(j),
chapter 6, Oregon Laws 2020
(second special session)) .......... June 30, 2027
(e) Portland State Office Building
Renovation (Other Funds)
(section 1 (1)(j), chapter
747, Oregon Laws 2017) ............ June 30, 2027
(f) Portland State Office Building
Upgrades (Other Funds) (section
1 (1)(d), chapter 662, Oregon
Laws 2019)........................ December 31, 2027
(g) Revenue Building Electrical
System Upgrades (Other Funds)
(section 1 (1)(c), chapter
662, Oregon Laws 2019) ............ June 30, 2027
(h) Capital Mall Parking Structure
Study and Upgrades (Other
Funds) (section 1 (1)(e),
chapter 747, Oregon
Laws 2017) ................................ June 30, 2027
(i) DHS Building Upgrades (Other
Funds) (section 1 (1)(b),
chapter 747, Oregon
Laws 2017) ................................ June 30, 2027
(j) Electrical Upgrades and
Replacements (Other Funds)
(section 1 (1)(d), chapter
747, Oregon Laws 2017) .... December 31, 2025
(k) Deferred Maintenance (Other
Funds) (section 1 (1)(a),
chapter 662, Oregon
Laws 2019)........................ December 31, 2025
(L) Parking Facility Repair and
Upgrades (Other Funds)
(section 1, chapter 662,
Oregon Laws 2019, as amended by
section 1 (1)(g), chapter 6,
Oregon Laws 2020
(second special session)) ..December 31, 2025
(m) Security and Security Systems
(Other Funds) (section 1,
chapter 662, Oregon Laws 2019,
as amended by section 1 (1)(h),
chapter 6, Oregon Laws 2020
(second special session)) ..December 31, 2025
(2) Oregon Department of Aviation,
Prospect State Airport Runway
Reconstruction (Other Funds)
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 4
(section 1 (6)(a), chapter 662,
Oregon Laws 2019) ................... June 30, 2026
(3) Oregon Military Department:
(a) Jackson Armory Service Life
Extension (Other Funds)
(section 1 (2)(c), chapter 662,
Oregon Laws 2019) ................... June 30, 2027
(b) Oregon Military Museum (Other
Funds) (section 1 (2)(d),
chapter 662, Oregon
Laws 2019) ................................ June 30, 2027
(c) Salem and Anderson Readiness
Center Service Life Extension
(Other Funds) (section 1 (2)(b),
chapter 662, Oregon
Laws 2019) ................................ June 30, 2027
(d) Salem and Pendleton Aviation
Facility Emergency Enhancements
(Other Funds) (section 1 (2)(a),
chapter 662, Oregon
Laws 2019) ................................ June 30, 2027
(4) Department of Corrections:
(a) Camera Systems Upgrades (Other
Funds) (section 1 (4)(b),
chapter 662, Oregon
Laws 2019) ................................ June 30, 2027
(b) Capital Improvement and
Renewal (Other Funds) (section
1 (4)(c), chapter 662, Oregon
Laws 2019) ................................ June 30, 2027
(c) Radio System Replacement (Other
Funds) (section 1 (4)(a),
chapter 662, Oregon
Laws 2019) ................................ June 30, 2027
(5) Oregon Youth Authority:
(a) Capital Improvements (Other
Funds) (section 1 (3)(a),
chapter 747, Oregon
Laws 2017) ................................ June 30, 2027
(b) Control Room Renovations
(Other Funds) (section 1 (3)(d),
chapter 662, Oregon
Laws 2019) ................................ June 30, 2027
(c) MacLaren Infirmary and Pharmacy
Renovation (Other Funds)
(section 1 (3)(b), chapter 662,
Oregon Laws 2019) ................... June 30, 2027
(d) Rogue Valley Facility
Improvements (Other Funds)
(section 1 (3)(c), chapter 747,
Oregon Laws 2017) ................... June 30, 2027
(e) Tillamook Medical and Dental
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 5
Renovations (Other Funds)
(section 1 (3)(a), chapter 662,
Oregon Laws 2019) ................... June 30, 2027
(6) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission:
(a) Public University Projects
(Other Funds) (section 3,
chapter 662, Oregon
Laws 2019) ................................ June 30, 2027
(b) Public University Projects
(Other Funds) (section 3,
chapter 662, Oregon Laws 2019,
as amended by section 2,
chapter 6, Oregon Laws 2020
(second special session)) .......... June 30, 2027
(c) Public University Projects
(Other Funds) (section 3,
chapter 747, Oregon
Laws 2017) ................................ June 30, 2027
(7) State Forestry Department,
Toledo Facility Replacement
(Other Funds) (section 1 (9),
chapter 747, Oregon
Laws 2017) ................................ June 30, 2027
(8) Housing and Community Services
Department:
(a) Local Innovation and Fast Track
(LIFT) Housing (Other Funds)
(section 1 (7)(a), chapter
662, Oregon Laws 2019) ............ June 30, 2027
(b) Permanent Supportive Housing
(Other Funds) (section 1 (7)(b),
chapter 662, Oregon
Laws 2019) ................................ June 30, 2027
SECTION 7.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 6
Passed by Senate June 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 7